Washington statutes.
RCW 39.104.050

Limitations on revitalization areas.

The designation of a revitalization area is subject to the following limitations:

(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, no revitalization area may have within its geographic boundaries any part of a hospital benefit zone under chapter 39.100 RCW, any part of a revenue development area created under chapter 39.102 RCW, any part of an increment area under chapter 39.89 RCW, or any part of another revitalization area under this chapter;

(b) A revitalization area's boundaries may include all or a portion of an existing increment area if:

(i) The state of Washington has loaned money for environmental cleanup on such area in order to stimulate redevelopment of brownfields;

(ii) The environmental cleanup, for which the state's loans were intended, has been completed; and

(iii) The sponsoring local government determines the creation of the revitalization area is necessary for redevelopment and protecting the state's investment by increasing property tax revenue;

(2) A revitalization area is limited to contiguous tracts, lots, pieces, or parcels of land without the creation of islands of property not included in the revitalization area;

(3) The boundaries may not be drawn to purposely exclude parcels where economic growth is unlikely to occur;

(4) The public improvements financed through bonds issued under RCW 39.104.110 must be located in the revitalization area;

(5) A revitalization area cannot comprise an area containing more than twenty-five percent of the total assessed value of the taxable real property within the boundaries of the sponsoring local government at the time the revitalization area is created;

(6) The boundaries of the revitalization area may not be changed for the time period that local property tax allocation revenues, local sales and use taxes of participating local governments, and the local sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.510 are used to pay bonds issued under RCW 39.104.110 and public improvement costs within the revitalization area on a pay-as-you-go basis, as provided under this chapter; and

(7) A revitalization area must be geographically restricted to the location of the public improvement and adjacent locations that the sponsoring local government finds to have a high likelihood of receiving direct positive business and economic impacts due to the public improvement, such as a neighborhood or a block.

[ 2010 c 164 s 3; 2009 c 270 s 105.]